Utah statutes.
20A-2-304.   County clerk's responsibilities -- Notice of disposition.

Each county clerk shall:

(1)  register to vote each applicant for registration who meets the requirements for registration and who:

(a)  submits a completed voter registration form to the county clerk on or before the voter registration deadline;

(b)  submits a completed voter registration form to the Driver License Division, a public assistance agency, or a discretionary voter registration agency on or before the voter registration deadline; or

(c)  mails a completed by-mail voter registration form to the county clerk on or before the voter registration deadline; and

(2)  send a notice to the voter informing the voter that:

(a)  the voter's application for voter registration has been accepted and that the voter is registered to vote;

(b)  the voter's application for voter registration has been rejected and the reason for the rejection; or

(c)  the application for voter registration is being returned to the voter for further action because the application is incomplete and giving instructions to the voter about how to properly complete the application.



Amended by Chapter 264, 2006 General Session

